Colorado, session 2026A, HB1345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-18-302, amend
(4)(b), (8), (9), (10), (14), and (17); repeal (18); and add (2.5), (11.5), and
(21.5) as follows:
23-18-302. Definitions - repeal.
As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2.5) (a) "CO-LOCATED DEGREE PARTNERSHIP" MEANS A PROGRAM
FORMALIZED BY A WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN TWO INSTITUTIONS IN
WHICH:
(I) A STUDENT IS ENROLLED AS A DEGREE-SEEKING STUDENT AT
THEIR HOME INSTITUTION IN A DEGREE PROGRAM THAT IS NOT OFFERED TO
COMPLETION AT THEIR HOME INSTITUTION;
(II) THE STUDENT SUBSEQUENTLY MATRICULATES AS A TRANSFER
AND DEGREE-SEEKING STUDENT AT A PARTNER INSTITUTION THAT OFFERS
THE DEGREE PROGRAM TO COMPLETION THAT THE STUDENT'S HOME
INSTITUTION DOES NOT OFFER TO COMPLETION; AND
(III) FOR A PERIOD OF TIME, AS DEFINED BY THE AGREEMENT
BETWEEN THE TWO INSTITUTIONS, THE STUDENT CONTINUES TO PRIMARILY
BE LOCATED AT THE HOME INSTITUTION'S CAMPUS, INCLUDING RECEIVING
INSTRUCTION, ACADEMIC SERVICES, LIBRARY ACCESS, OR STUDENT SUPPORT
SERVICES FROM THE HOME INSTITUTION.
(b) "CO-LOCATED DEGREE PARTNERSHIP" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN ARTICULATION PATHWAY WITHOUT A CO-LOCATION DELIVERY
COMPONENT, INCLUDING A STATEWIDE, BILATERAL OR MULTILATERAL
TRANSFER AGREEMENT;
(II) GENERAL TRANSFER PARTNERSHIPS;
(III) CROSS-REGISTRATION OR COURSE-SHARING PARTNERSHIPS,
INCLUDING ONLINE-ONLY COURSE ARRANGEMENTS;
(IV) CONCURRENT OR DUAL ENROLLMENT WITHOUT A CO-LOCATION
DELIVERY COMPONENT; OR
(V) ANY PROGRAM IN A DEGREE PROGRAM THAT IS OFFERED TO
COMPLETION AT THE STUDENT'S HOME INSTITUTION.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT THE GOVERNING BOARDS
COLLECT AND REPORT THE DATA IN A CONSISTENT MANNER.
(4) "Credential completion" means the calculation of student
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

credential completion by a governing board based on equal weighting of the
total resident student completions of postsecondary credentials in a given
state fiscal year. The credential completion calculation includes:
(b) Equal weighting for a resident student who transfers out of an
institution with a community college role and mission specified in statute,
after accumulating at least eighteen credit hours at the institution in a
two-year degree program AND TRANSFERRING WITHIN THE NEXT ACADEMIC
YEAR INTO ANOTHER INSTITUTION, AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE, OR LOCAL
DISTRICT COLLEGE.
(8) "One-hundred-fifty-percent-of-time graduation rate" means, for
a four-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time,
degree-seeking undergraduate students starting in the fall term and
graduating within six years with a bachelor's degree from the same
institution, and, for a two-year institution, the percentage of first-time,
full-time, associate degree-seeking or undergraduate certificate-seeking
students starting in the fall term and completing their declared program
within one hundred fifty percent of the normal time to completion, as
reported to the integrated postsecondary education data system maintained
by the federal department of education. If the integrated postsecondary
education data system does not include data for an institution or governing
board for prior state fiscal years, the department shall use its available data,
as reported by the governing board to the department through the
student-unit record database, in place of the missing integrated
postsecondary education data system data DEPARTMENT. The department
shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the data in a
consistent manner. A student may be counted only once in a state fiscal year
for purposes of this performance RESULTS-INFORMED funding metric.
STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A CO-LOCATED DEGREE PARTNERSHIP ARE NOT
INCLUDED IN THE COHORTS THAT DETERMINE THE
ONE-HUNDRED-FIFTY-PERCENT-OF-TIME GRADUATION RATE.
(9) "One-hundred-percent-of-time graduation rate" means, for a
four-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, degree-seeking
undergraduate students starting in the fall term and graduating within four
years with a bachelor's degree from the same institution, and, for a two-year
institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, associate degree-seeking
or undergraduate certificate-seeking students starting in the fall term and
completing their declared program within one hundred percent of the
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

normal time to completion, as reported to the integrated postsecondary
education data system maintained by the federal department of education.
If the integrated postsecondary education data system does not include data
for an institution or governing board for prior state fiscal years, the
department shall use its available data, as reported by the governing board
to the department through the student-unit record database, in place of the
missing integrated postsecondary education data system data DEPARTMENT.
The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the
data in a consistent manner. A student may be counted only once in a state
fiscal year for purposes of this performance RESULTS-INFORMED funding
metric. STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A CO-LOCATED DEGREE PARTNERSHIP ARE
NOT INCLUDED IN THE COHORTS THAT DETERMINE THE
ONE-HUNDRED-PERCENT-OF-TIME GRADUATION RATE.
(10) "Pell-eligible "PELL-RECIPIENT student" means an
undergraduate student who qualifies for RECEIVES the federal Pell grant or
for a grant through a successor program.
(11.5) "PREVIOUS SHARE" MEANS THE PERCENTAGE SHARE OF
FUNDING APPROPRIATED TO EACH GOVERNING BOARD FROM THE TOTAL
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED IN THE PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR PURSUANT
TO SECTIONS 23-18-202 AND 23-18-303.5, EXCLUDING THE AMOUNT
APPROPRIATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 23-18-303.5 (3).
(14) "Resident Pell-eligible PELL-RECIPIENT UNDERGRADUATE
student population share" means the resident Pell-eligible PELL-RECIPIENT
UNDERGRADUATE student head count as a percentage of the overall resident
UNDERGRADUATE student population head count, EXCLUDING CONCURRENT
ENROLLMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 22-35-103, from the end-of-term fall
enrollment collected by the department.
(17) "Retention rate" means, for a four-year institution, the
percentage of first-time, full-time OR FIRST-TIME, PART-TIME undergraduate
students starting in the fall term and returning for their second fall term at
the same institution, and, for a two-year institution, the percentage of
first-time, full-time OR FIRST-TIME, PART-TIME associate degree-seeking or
undergraduate certificate-seeking students starting in the fall term and either
returning for or successfully completing their declared program by the
second fall term at the same institution, as reported to the integrated
postsecondary education data system maintained by the federal department
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

of education. If the integrated postsecondary education data system does not
include data for an institution or governing board for prior state fiscal years,
the department shall use its available data, as reported by the governing
board to the department through the student-unit record database, in place
of the missing integrated postsecondary education data system data
DEPARTMENT. The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect
and report the data in a consistent manner. A student may be counted only
once in a state fiscal year for purposes of this performance
RESULTS-INFORMED funding metric.
(18) (a) "Role and mission share" means the percentage share of
funding appropriated to each governing board of the total amount
appropriated in the preceding state fiscal year pursuant to sections
23-18-202 and 23-18-303.5, excluding the amount appropriated pursuant to
section 23-18-303.5 (3).
(b) Repealed.
(21.5) "TOTAL PREVIOUS ADJUSTED SHARE" MEANS THE TOTAL OF
THE PREVIOUS ADJUSTED SHARES FOR ALL GOVERNING BOARDS, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 23-18-303.5 (1.5)(c).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-18-303.5, amend
(1)(a), (2) introductory portion, (2)(a), (3), and (7); repeal (4), (5), and (8);
and add (1.3) and (1.5) as follows:
23-18-303.5. Fee-for-service contracts - authorization -
results-informed funding.
(1) (a) For the 2021-22 2027-28 state fiscal year and each state fiscal
year thereafter, the governing board of a state institution of higher education
may annually negotiate a fee-for-service contract with the department
pursuant to this section for the delivery of higher education services by the
institution for the benefit of the state and its residents. Specialty education
programs, area technical colleges, and local district colleges are funded
pursuant to the provisions of section 23-18-304.
(1.3) Results-informed funding metrics.
(a) THE COMMISSION, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

IN COLLABORATION WITH THE GOVERNING BOARDS, SHALL CALCULATE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING FOR EACH GOVERNING BOARD BASED ON THE
RATE OF CHANGE OVER TIME IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE INSTITUTIONS
OVERSEEN BY THE GOVERNING BOARD ON THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRICS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1.3)(b) OF THIS SECTION. THE
RECOMMENDATION FOR RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING MAY REFLECT A
CHANGE IN THE TOTAL STATE APPROPRIATION, LESS THE AMOUNT
APPROPRIATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION FROM THE
PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(b) THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRICS INCLUDE:
(I) RESIDENT STUDENT FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT ENROLLMENT;
(II) CREDENTIAL COMPLETION;
(III) RESIDENT PELL-RECIPIENT UNDERGRADUATE STUDENT
POPULATION SHARE;
(IV) RESIDENT UNDERREPRESENTED MINORITY STUDENT
POPULATION SHARE;
(V) RETENTION RATE;
(VI) ONE-HUNDRED-PERCENT-OF-TIME GRADUATION RATE;
(VII) ONE-HUNDRED-FIFTY-PERCENT-OF-TIME GRADUATION RATE;
AND
(VIII) RESIDENT FIRST-GENERATION UNDERGRADUATE STUDENT
POPULATION SHARE.
(c) (I) IN PREPARING ANNUAL BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS, THE
COMMISSION, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE GOVERNING BOARDS, MAY ANNUALLY IDENTIFY
THE PORTION OF TOTAL RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING THAT IS ALLOCATED
TO EACH RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(1.3)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, AFTER CONSIDERING THE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

COMMISSION'S ANNUAL BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS, SHALL DETERMINE THE
PORTION OF TOTAL RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING FOR THE APPLICABLE STATE
FISCAL YEAR THAT IS ALLOCATED TO EACH RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1.3)(b) OF THIS SECTION. EACH
GOVERNING BOARD'S SHARE OF THE FUNDING ALLOCATED FOR EACH
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC IS DETERMINED USING THE
CALCULATION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1.5) OF THIS SECTION.
(1.5) Results-informed funding - lever one.
(a) THE AMOUNT OF RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING THAT A
GOVERNING BOARD RECEIVES FOR EACH RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1.3)(b) OF THIS SECTION IS BASED ON THE
RATE OF CHANGE OVER TIME IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE INSTITUTIONS
OVERSEEN BY THE GOVERNING BOARD ON THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC.
(b) THE RATE OF CHANGE FOR EACH RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC IS CALCULATED ANNUALLY FOR A GOVERNING BOARD BY DIVIDING
THE AVERAGE OF THE FOUR MOST RECENT YEARS OF ACTUAL DATA
REPORTED BY THE GOVERNING BOARD FOR THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC BY THE AVERAGE OF THE THREE OLDEST OF THE FOUR YEARS OF
ACTUAL DATA REPORTED BY THE GOVERNING BOARD FOR THE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC.
(c) THE RATE OF CHANGE FOR THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING
METRIC IS THEN MULTIPLIED BY EACH GOVERNING BOARD'S PREVIOUS SHARE,
RESULTING IN THE GOVERNING BOARD'S PREVIOUS ADJUSTED SHARE FOR THE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC. THE TOTAL OF THE PREVIOUS
ADJUSTED SHARES FOR ALL GOVERNING BOARDS IS THE TOTAL PREVIOUS
ADJUSTED SHARE FOR THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC.
(d) EACH GOVERNING BOARD'S ALLOCATION FOR THE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC IS DETERMINED BY DIVIDING THE
GOVERNING BOARD'S PREVIOUS ADJUSTED SHARE FOR THE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC BY THE TOTAL PREVIOUS ADJUSTED
SHARE FOR THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC, ENSURING THAT THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF FUNDING DISTRIBUTED THROUGH THE
RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC DOES NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF
FUNDING ALLOCATED FOR THE RESULTS-INFORMED FUNDING METRIC.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

(2) Ongoing performance funding - lever two. Prior to calculating
performance funding recommendations pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section, The commission, in conjunction with the department and in
collaboration with the governing boards, may recommend an additional
amount of funding pursuant to this subsection (2) for an institution, which
amount is ongoing base PERFORMANCE funding for the receiving institution
and is included in the calculation of funding pursuant to this part 3 in
subsequent state fiscal years. The commission may recommend an
additional amount of funding for the following purposes:
(a) To increase appropriations over the previous state fiscal year in
order to make progress toward master plan goals, which may include
addressing base PERFORMANCE funding disparities, HISTORIC INEQUITIES,
THE UNIQUE ROLE OF AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES, or funding priorities not
addressed through the performance RESULTS-INFORMED funding metrics.
The commission shall focus its recommendations on broad institutional,
systemwide, or state policy goals.
(3) One-time investments - lever three. After calculating funding
recommendations pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, The
commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with
the governing boards, may recommend an additional amount of temporary
funding pursuant to this subsection (3) for an institution for purposes of
making progress toward goals identified in the systemwide master planning
process set forth in section 23-1-108 or other areas as identified by the
commission. Additional funding received pursuant to this subsection (3)
must be allocated for a specific period of time, is not ongoing base funding,
and is not included in the calculation of funding pursuant to this part 3 in
subsequent state fiscal years or in the calculation of the total state
appropriation made pursuant to this part 3.
(4) Performance funding metrics.
(a) After calculating funding recommendations pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, the commission, in conjunction with the
department and in collaboration with the governing boards, shall calculate
performance funding for each governing board based on the rate of change
over time in the performance of the institutions overseen by the governing
board on the performance funding metrics specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section. The recommendation for performance funding may reflect a
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

change in the total state appropriation, less the amount appropriated
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, from the preceding state fiscal
year.
(b) The performance funding metrics include:
(I) Resident student full-time equivalent enrollment;
(II) Credential completion;
(III) Resident Pell-eligible student population share;
(IV) Resident underrepresented minority student population share;
(V) Retention rate;
(VI) One-hundred-percent-of-time graduation rate;
(VII) One-hundred-fifty-percent-of-time graduation rate; and
(VIII) Resident first-generation undergraduate student population
share.
(c) (I) Beginning with the 2021-22 state fiscal year, in preparing
budget recommendations, the commission, in conjunction with the
department and in collaboration with the governing boards, may annually
identify the portion of total performance funding that is allocated to each
performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(II) For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year
thereafter, the joint budget committee, after considering the commission's
budget recommendations, shall determine the portion of total performance
funding for the applicable state fiscal year that is allocated to each
performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
Each governing board's share of the funding allocated for each performance
funding metric is determined using the calculation set forth in subsection (5)
of this section.
(5) Performance funding calculation.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

(a) The amount of performance funding that a governing board
receives for each performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b)
of this section is based on the rate of change over time in the performance
of the institutions overseen by the governing board on the performance
funding metric. The rate of change for each performance funding metric is
calculated annually for a governing board by dividing the average of the
four most recent years of actual data reported by the governing board for the
metric by the average of the three oldest of the four years of actual data
reported by the governing board for the metric. The rate of change for the
performance funding metric is then multiplied by each governing board's
role and mission share, resulting in the "governing board role and mission
adjusted share" for the performance funding metric. The total of the
governing board role and mission adjusted shares for all governing boards
is the "total role and mission adjusted share" for the performance funding
metric. Each governing board's allocation for the performance funding
metric is then determined by dividing the governing board's role and
mission adjusted share for the performance funding metric by the total role
and mission adjusted share for the performance funding metric, ensuring
that the total amount of funding distributed through the performance
funding metric does not exceed the amount of funding allocated for the
performance funding metric.
(b) Repealed.
(7) When requesting or determining a change in performance
RESULTS-INFORMED funding pursuant to subsection (4) SUBSECTION (1.5)
of this section and tuition spending authority for governing boards, the
department and the joint budget committee shall consider, at a minimum,
cost increases to base funding at all institutions, including those related to
common policies annually submitted in the governor's November 1 budget
request and adopted by the joint budget committee, and the commission's
master plan goals.
(8) The board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines may study
and recommend to the general assembly a different funding structure,
including but not limited to a special purpose authority as defined in section
24-77-102 (15), that strengthens the institution and its specialized
educational programs while ensuring academic quality and continued
opportunities for resident students who meet the admissions criteria of the
institution.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-18-306, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(II)(A), and (1)(a)(II)(B); and repeal (4)
as follows:
23-18-306. Duties and powers of the commission - budget
provisions - periodic review of funding formula - report.
(1) (a) For the 2021-22 state fiscal year 2027-28 STATE FISCAL YEAR
and each state fiscal year thereafter, the department and commission shall
submit a budget request by November 1 of each year that includes:
(II) Recommendations for:
(A) Changes in the amount of performance RESULTS-INFORMED
funding pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (4) SPECIFIED IN SECTION
23-18-303.5 (1.5), if any;
(B) The percentage allocation of performance RESULTS-INFORMED
funding among the performance RESULTS-INFORMED funding metrics
specified in section 23-18-303.5 (4)(b) SECTION 23-18-303.5 (1.3);
(4) The commission, in conjunction with the department and in
collaboration with the governing boards, shall identify and make
recommendations concerning ways to better measure the success of students
who are pursuing a credential or degree and who are not included in the
first-time, full-time student cohort. On or before July 1, 2022, the
commission shall submit its recommendations to the joint budget
committee, which may include a recommendation for a statutory change to
the calculation of one of the graduation rate performance funding metrics
specified in section 23-18-303.5 (4)(b).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.3-102, add (10)
as follows:
23-3.3-102. Assistance program authorized - procedure - audits
- definitions - repeal.
(10) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE 23 TO THE
CONTRARY, FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
NOT ALLOCATE MONEY TO A NONPUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

EDUCATION; PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 23-18-102 (9); OR PROPRIETARY INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, FOR ITS STUDENTS UNDER A PROGRAM OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (10) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-3.3-401, add (5) as
follows:
23-3.3-401. Work-study program established - requirements.
(5) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE 23 TO THE
CONTRARY, FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
NOT ALLOCATE MONEY TO A NONPUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION; PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 23-18-102 (9); OR PROPRIETARY INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, FOR ITS STUDENTS UNDER A WORK-STUDY PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 6. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
upon passage; except that sections 1 to 3 of this act take effect August 1,
2026, and sections 1 to 3 of this act apply to state institution of higher
education budgets beginning in state fiscal year 2027-28.
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1345

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1345